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−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINEIMMOBILISERSYSTEM
DI−909

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC B2799/99 Engine Immobileser System Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when the ECM detects errors in the communication between the Transponder Key ECU
and the ECM, and in the communication lines.
This DTC is also output when the engine start is attempted with the COMMUNICATION ID between the
Transponder key ECU and the ECM is different.
Before troubleshooting for this DTC, make sure that there is no DTC detected in the Transponder Key ECU.
If there isKeycode −relatedDTC(B279X)detected in theTransponderKeyECU, repair it first.

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

B2799

SError incommunicationbetweenECMandTransponderKey
ECU, and in communication line.
SCOMMUNICATIONID isdifferent incommunicationwith
Transponder Key ECU.

SWireharness
STransponderKeyECU
SECM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check wire harness and connector between Transponder Key ECU and ECM
(See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace wire harness or connector.

OK

Replace the ECM


